Washington statutes.
RCW 43.382.030

Developmental disabilities ombuds—Prohibited acts.

(1) A developmental disabilities ombuds shall not have participated in the paid provision of services to any person with developmental disabilities within the past year.

(2) A developmental disabilities ombuds shall not have been employed in a governmental position with direct involvement in the licensing, certification, or regulation of a paid developmental disabilities service provider within the past year.

(3) No developmental disabilities ombuds or any member of his or her immediate family may have, or have had within the past year, any significant ownership or investment interest in a paid provider of services to persons with developmental disabilities.

(4) A developmental disabilities ombuds shall not be assigned to investigate a facility or provider of services which provides care or services to a member of that ombuds' immediate family.

[ 2016 c 172 s 8.]

NOTES:

Finding—2016 c 172: See note following RCW 43.382.005.